Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 13. Addicted Offender Accountability

§ 7-13-1301.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

7-13-1301

through

7-13-1304

:

“Adequate treatment alternative” is a community program certified under rules adopted by the department of health for purposes of providing substance abuse and other related services to criminal offenders. The program shall provide the level of services required of the offender being referred, be certified by the department of health to treat the criminal justice population and shall include protections, including psychological testing and frequent chemical drug testing that can be reasonably relied upon to protect the public safety and to hold the offender accountable;

“Community facility or program” means a community based or community-oriented facility or program which is operated either by a unit of local government or by a nongovernmental agency which provides substance abuse treatment and other necessary programs, services and monitoring to aid offenders in obtaining and holding regular employment, in enrolling in and maintaining academic courses or participating in vocational training programs, in utilizing the resources of the community in meeting their personal and family needs and in participating in other specialized treatment programs existing within the state. These services may be provided directly or through referrals to other programs;

“Convicted” means an unvacated determination of guilt by any court having legal jurisdiction of the offense and from which no appeal is pending and includes pleas of guilty and nolo contendere. For purposes of W.S.

7-13-1302

only, “convicted” shall include dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

, 7-13-302(a),

35-7-1037

or deferred prosecutions when ordered. Otherwise, for purposes of this act, “convicted” shall not include dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

, 7-13-302(a),

35-7-1037

or deferred prosecutions;

“Qualified offender” means a person convicted of a felony whom the court finds has a need for alcohol or other drug treatment. The payment amount required of the offender for treatment shall be based on the ability of the offender to pay as established on a sliding fee scale pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the department of health and may, at the discretion of the court, be paid through delayed or installment payments. In determining an offender’s ability to pay the court may consider present circumstances as well as reasonable future potential;

“Substance abuse assessment” means an evaluation conducted by a qualified person using practices and procedures approved by the department of health to determine whether a person has a need for alcohol or other drug treatment and the level of treatment services required to treat that person;

“Violent felony” means murder, manslaughter, kidnapping, sexual assault in the first or second degree, robbery, aggravated assault, strangulation of a household member, aircraft hijacking, arson in the first or second degree, aggravated burglary, a violation of W.S. 6-2-314(a)(i) or 6-2-315(a)(ii) or a third, or subsequent, domestic battery under W.S. 6-2-511(a) and (b)(iii);

“This act” means W.S.

7-13-1301

through

7-13-1304

.

For purposes of this act “incarceration” or “incarcerated” shall not include periods of confinement allowed under the provisions of W.S.

7-13-1102

or

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2018 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(vi), inserted “strangulation
of a household member” and added “a violation of W.S.
6-2-314(a)(i) or 6-2-315(a)(ii) or a third, or subsequent, domestic
battery under W.S. 6-2-511(a) and (b)(iii).”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b), substituted "or

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

" for "or 7-13-1107(b)."

Cross references. —

For provisions of the Substance Abuse Control Plan see §

9-2-2701

et seq.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Qualified offender. —

Wyoming Legislature
intended that a substance abuse assessment occur prior to sentencing;
therefore, in a case where defendant pled guilty to driving while
under the influence and a controlled substance offense, his argument
that he had not been convicted since the case was on appeal was rejected.
Defendant's criminal record and the substance abuse assessment supported
the district court's finding that defendant was a qualified offender
and in need of treatment. Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168, 340 P.3d 283,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 2014).

Confidential information. —

Presentence investigation report under the Addicted Offender Accountability Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1301

et seq., did not improperly contain confidential information because the information contained the in the evaluator's report to the probation and parole officer, which related directly to defendant's propensity for violence, was meant to be related to the district court as it was indispensable in deciding whether treatment options should be considered as part of any sentence.
Janpol v. State, 2008 WY 21, 178 P.3d 396,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2008).

§ 7-13-1302.
Substance abuse assessment required.

All persons convicted of a third misdemeanor under W.S. 31-5-233(e) or a felony shall receive a substance abuse assessment. The substance abuse assessment shall be part of a presentence report if prepared. The cost of the substance abuse assessment shall be assessed to and paid by the offender. A person who has undergone a substance abuse assessment pursuant to W.S. 31-5-233(e) may receive a second assessment under this section if the court finds that enough time has passed to make the first assessment inaccurate.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2003, ch. 47, § 1; 2019 ch. 167, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted "as a part of a presentence report" from the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 167 § 2, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons convicted of a crime on or after the effective date of this act."

Sentence Not Illegal.—

District court properly denied defendant's motions to correct an illegal sentence because there was no increase in punishment and no violation of his double jeopardy protections; all of the fees imposed upon defendant's conviction were mandated by statute, and thus, it was unnecessary for the district court to attach the fees to the stalking charge in the initial sentence.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Amended Sentence.—

District court had the authority on remand to amend defendant's sentence because the amended sentence was consistent with the district court's original sentence and merely reconfirmed that the statutorily-mandated fees remained part of defendant sentence; the statutory assessments were imposed because defendant had been convicted of a crime, and on remand, he still was convicted of a crime.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Imposition of Fees.—

Statutes indicate that the fees are imposed as a result of being convicted in a criminal case, not as part of the sentence for any particular crime; the statutes envision that sentencing courts impose the mandated fees separately as part of the overall sentence, rather than as part of the sentence for an individual charge.
Hawes v. State, 2016 WY 30, 368 P.3d 879,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 2016 WY 30,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2016).

Prior to sentencing. —

Wyoming Legislature
intended that a substance abuse assessment occur prior to sentencing;
therefore, in a case where defendant pled guilty to driving while
under the influence and a controlled substance offense, his argument
that he had not been convicted since the case was on appeal was rejected.
Defendant's criminal record and the substance abuse assessment supported
the district court's finding that defendant was a qualified offender
and in need of treatment. Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168, 340 P.3d 283,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 2014).

Report did not improperly contain confidential information. —

Presentence investigation report under the Addicted Offender Accountability Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1301

et seq., did not improperly contain confidential information because the information contained the in the evaluator's report to the probation and parole officer, which related directly to defendant's propensity for violence, was meant to be related to the district court as it was indispensable in deciding whether treatment options should be considered as part of any sentence.
Janpol v. State, 2008 WY 21, 178 P.3d 396,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2008).

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2005, ch. 135, § 1, as amended by
Laws 2005, ch. 230 § 5, appropriates $50,000 from the general fund to the department of health to conduct a methamphetamine initiative planning study. The department is to (1) review the scope of the methamphetamine problem as it exists in the state; (2) examine efforts currently being used in the state and elsewhere to address the problems associated with methamphetamine use, its prevention, correction and treatment including efforts by the department of health, the state's education system, law enforcement, the courts, social service agencies, local governments and the department of corrections and probation and parole; (3) determine the number of persons being treated for methamphetamine use, or needing treatment for methamphetamine use and the number of existing treatment beds available and potential treatment beds in health care and detention facilities in the state to provide the treatment for those persons in need of residential care; (4) determine the current capacity and potential needs for intensive and other types of out-patient treatment throughout the state by geographic regions; (5) examine the existing capacity and procedures for conducting and completing substance abuse evaluations ordered for methamphetamine use, abuse or distribution under
§ 7-13-1032 [§

7-13-1302

], including the number of qualified evaluators available and conducting evaluations in the state, the costs associated with the evaluations and any recommendations to improve the capacity, quality, efficiency and effectiveness of the evaluation process, as necessary. The department of health may contract with an independent entity to perform the study and report back to the department with the results of the study. After review of the contractor's report to the department, the department is to submit its findings and recommendations to the governor's substance abuse and violent crime advisory board, the joint appropriations interim committee, the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, the joint judiciary interim committee and any select committee studying mental health and substance abuse services no later than October 15, 2005. The chairmen of these legislative committees are to coordinate efforts to review the problems and solutions identified by the department of health prior to the 2006 budget session of the legislature.

Laws 2005, ch. 135, § 2, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

§ 7-13-1303.
Suspended sentence for qualified offenders.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, notwithstanding any other provision of law, qualified offenders may be placed on probation under W.S.

7-13-301

, receive a suspended sentence under W.S. 7-13-302(a) or placed on probation under W.S.

35-7-1037

. The sentence or probation order shall set forth the terms of a treatment program based upon the substance abuse assessment and any other terms and conditions as the court may deem appropriate under the circumstances, and require the offender to satisfactorily complete the treatment program. The court shall include in the sentence or probation order any provisions necessary to reasonably protect the health of the offender.

The treatment provider shall be required to report to the court, the prosecuting attorney, probation officer and counsel representing the offender not less than once per month on the offender’s progress in meeting the requirements of the sentence and the program.

A qualified offender or person sentenced under this act may be incarcerated if the court concludes on the basis of the evidence that:

No adequate treatment alternative exists;

Under the facts of the case, the interests of justice require a period of incarceration; provided however, under the circumstances, a portion of the sentence may be suspended under the conditions set forth in subsection (a) of this section;

The offender refuses to agree to participate in the court ordered treatment program or fails to satisfactorily complete the court ordered treatment program; or

The offender commits a felony, sells or otherwise delivers controlled substances while in a program pursuant to this section, or engages in other behavior that poses an unreasonable risk to public safety while in the program. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the absence of the commission of these acts, those programs and sanctions set forth in W.S.

7-13-1102

and

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

may be used at the discretion of the probation officer or court to address other violations of the sentencing or probation order.

In the event probation is revoked, the court may impose one (1) or more of the sanctions set forth in W.S.

7-13-1102

or

7-13-1801

through

7-13-1803

unless the court, in its sole discretion, finds that another disposition, including imprisonment, is necessary under the facts of the case.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1; 2019 ch. 116, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c)(iv) and in (d), substituted "7-13-1801 through

7-13-1803

" for "7-13-1107(b)."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1301(a)(vii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 116 § 4, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to all persons who are sentenced on or after the effective date of this act."

Discretion of Courts. —

Trial court did not err when it ordered a sentence of imprisonment where Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-1303(a) did not limit the discretion of the trial courts to make sentencing decisions and stated that qualified offenders “may” be placed on probation; it was not a requirement.
Duke v. State, 2009 WY 74, 209 P.3d 563,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2009).

Sentence Proper. —

Written judgment and a sentence were properly imposed because defendant received a substance abuse assessment, in compliance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1302

. The record reflected that the assessment was included with the presentence investigation report, and that the district court considered the assessment in determining defendant's sentence.
Greene v. State, 2009 WY 99, 214 P.3d 222,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited in

Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Dec. 23, 2014).

§ 7-13-1304.
Rebuttable presumption in violent crime or delivery of controlled substance cases.

If a person has been convicted of a violent felony or delivery or unlawful manufacture of a controlled substance under W.S.

35-7-1031

, there is a rebuttable presumption that the person is not a “qualified offender” for purposes of sentencing under this act. This presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the person who is an otherwise qualified offender convicted of a violent felony could participate in a treatment program without posing an unreasonable risk to the safety of the public. As to persons convicted of manufacture or delivery of a controlled substance, the presumption may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence that the person committed the crime because of his own dependency.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-13-1301(a)(vii).

Report did not improperly contain confidential information. —

Presentence investigation report under the Addicted Offender Accountability Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-13-1301

et seq., did not improperly contain confidential information because the information contained the in the evaluator's report to the probation and parole officer, which related directly to defendant's propensity for violence, was meant to be related to the district court as it was indispensable in deciding whether treatment options should be considered as part of any sentence.
Janpol v. State, 2008 WY 21, 178 P.3d 396,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 2008).

Cited in

Marshall v. State, 2014 WY 168,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Dec. 23, 2014).